Hawaii, session 2026, HB1881.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 205, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§205-     Passenger ropeways; mountains; prohibited.  (a) Notwithstanding sections 46-4, 205-2, 205-4.5, 205-5, and 205-6 or any other law to the contrary, passenger ropeways shall be prohibited on mountain lands within all land use districts. (b)  As used in this section: "Aerial lift" means a ropeway on which passengers are transported in cabins or on chairs. "Aerial tramway" means a ropeway on which passengers are transported in cable-supported carriers that: (1)  Are not in contact with the ground or terrain; and (2)  Reciprocate between terminals. "Commercial funicular" means a ropeway on which carriers are supported and guided by a guideway, are propelled by means of a haul rope system, and are operated as a single or double reversible system and which is used for commercial purposes. "Detachable grip lift" means a monocable or bicable ropeway system on which carriers circulate around the system alternately attaching to and detaching from a moving haul rope. "Mountain" means a natural elevation of the earth's surface that rises prominently above the surrounding terrain and satisfies at least two of the following criteria: (1)  The summit or highest point of the landform is at least one thousand feet above the base elevation of the surrounding terrain within a horizontal radius of three miles; (2)  The average natural slope of the landform, measured from base to summit, is fifteen per cent or greater over a horizontal distance of at least one thousand feet; (3)  The landform exhibits a topographic prominence of at least five hundred feet, as determined by United States Geological Survey topographic maps or equivalent geospatial data; or (4)  The landform is formally named and classified as a mountain in the United States Geological Survey Geographic Names Information System or equivalent federal or state registry. "Passenger ropeway" means a device or system used to transport passengers along a level, inclined, or declined path by means of a haul rope or other flexible elements that is driven by a power unit that remains essentially at a single location.  "Passenger ropeway" includes: (1)  Aerial lifts, including detachable grip lifts and chair lifts; (2)  Aerial tramways; and (3)  Commercial funiculars. "Passenger ropeway" does not include elevators." SECTION 2.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.